Rhode Island, session 2025, SB874.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 40-8 of the General Laws entitled "Medical Assistance" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
40-8-33. Licensed independent clinical social workers- services covered..
Notwithstanding any general law, public law, special law, rule or regulation to the contrary,
Medicaid reimbursement shall be provided under this chapter for services by licensed independent
clinical social workers and such workers shall be entitled to enroll and bill Medicaid fee-for-service
directly for authorized and/or covered services provided to adults with Medicaid fee-for-service
coverage. The director is hereby directed to develop and promulgate a fee schedule and any
necessary rules or regulations required to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001520
========